Tennessee, session 114, HB1520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 11, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Playgrounds at Booker T. Washington State Park and Harrison Bay State Park
must be built no later than January 1, 2027. The playgrounds must be built using
existing resources of the department of environment and conservation.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1520
009827
- 1 -